sources/apertium/apertium-en-ca.en-ca-smaller.dix
    <pardef n="twenty_hundred__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-one<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-two<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>dos-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-three<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>tres-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-four<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>quatre-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-five<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>cinc-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-six<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>sis-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-seven<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>set-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-eight<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>vuit-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-nine<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>nou-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="thirty_hundred__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-one<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-two<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>dos-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-three<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>tres-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-four<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>quatre-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-five<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>cinc-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-six<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>sis-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-seven<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>set-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-eight<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>vuit-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-nine<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l>
        <r><b/>mil<b/>nou-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="arabic-roman-ones-ord(1)">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>1st</l>
        <r>I</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>2nd</l>
        <r>II</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>3rd</l>
        <r>III</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>4th</l>
        <r>IV</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>5th</l>
        <r>V</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>6th</l>
        <r>VI</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>7th</l>
        <r>VII</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>8th</l>
        <r>VIII</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>9th</l>
        <r>IX</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="arabic-roman-ones-ord">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>0th</l>
        <r></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
        <par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord(1)"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="arabic-roman-tens-ord">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r></r>
      </p>
        <par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord(1)"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>2</l>
        <r>XX</r>
      </p>
        <par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>3</l>
        <r>XXX</r>
      </p>
        <par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>4</l>
        <r>XL</r>
      </p>
        <par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>5</l>
        <r>L</r>
      </p>
        <par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>6</l>
        <r>LX</r>
      </p>
        <par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>7</l>
        <r>LXX</r>
      </p>
        <par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>8</l>
        <r>LXXX</r>
      </p>
        <par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>9</l>
        <r>XC</r>
      </p>
        <par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="arabic-roman-ord">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>10th</l>
        <r>X</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>11th</l>
        <r>XI</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>12th</l>
        <r>XII</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>13th</l>
        <r>XIII</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>14th</l>
        <r>XIV</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>15th</l>
        <r>XV</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>16th</l>
        <r>XVI</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>17th</l>
        <r>XVII</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>18th</l>
        <r>XVIII</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>19th</l>
        <r>XIX</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
        <par n="arabic-roman-tens-ord"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="B.C.-aC">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>BC</l>
        <r><b/>aC</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>B.C</l>
        <r><b/>a.C</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>B.<b/>C</l>
        <r><b/>a.<b/>C</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>AD</l>
        <r><b/>dC</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>A.D</l>
        <r><b/>d.C</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>A.<b/>D</l>
        <r><b/>d.<b/>C</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l><b/>CE</l>
        <r><b/>dC</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l><b/>C.E</l>
        <r><b/>d.C</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l><b/>BCE</l>
        <r><b/>aC</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l><b/>B.C.E</l>
        <r><b/>a.C</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l><b/>C.<b/>E</l>
        <r><b/>d.<b/>C</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><b/>AD</l>
        <r><b/>AD</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><b/>A.D</l>
        <r><b/>A.D</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><b/>A.<b/>D</l>
        <r><b/>A.<b/>D</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="NPCOG">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></l>
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/></l>
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e r="LR"><p><l>eighty</l><r>vuit</r></p><par n="thirty_hundred__num"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>fifty</l><r>cinc</r></p><par n="thirty_hundred__num"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>forty</l><r>quatre</r></p><par n="thirty_hundred__num"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ninety</l><r>nou</r></p><par n="thirty_hundred__num"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>seventy</l><r>set</r></p><par n="thirty_hundred__num"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>sixty</l><r>sis</r></p><par n="thirty_hundred__num"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>thirty</l><r>tres</r></p><par n="thirty_hundred__num"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>twenty</l><r>dos</r></p><par n="twenty_hundred__num"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Aiestaran</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Anduela</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Anglada</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Aranaga</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Aranegi</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Arias</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Arruabarrena</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Arrupe</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Ayestaran</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Ayestarán</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Bravo</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Bretos</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Brizuela</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Colomer</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Cotado</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Coulomb</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Ohm</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Egurrola</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Elduayen</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Esnal</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Espel</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Etxaniz</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Etxebarria</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Garai</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Garaizar</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Goienetxea</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Goikoetxea</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Guzman</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Hijazo</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Hoyo</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Illarramendi</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Juaristi</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Kerejeta</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Korta</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Lasa</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Legarreta</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Legarretaetxeberría</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Lertxundi</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Lete</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Lujanbio</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Marcano</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Maritxalar</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Maza</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Miguel<b/>Bon</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Miguel<b/>Buen</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Mikeo</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Moreira</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Mugartegi</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Muguruza</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Navalón</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Oribe</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Pena</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Poza</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Prieto</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Revolvo</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Sainz<b/>de<b/>la<b/>Maza</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Silva</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Tenorio</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Urien</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e a="eleka"><i>Zabalondo</i><par n="NPCOG"/></e>
    <e c="hic sunt dracones!"><p><l></l><r>segle<b/></r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l><b/>century</l><r></r></p><par n="B.C.-aC"/><p><l><s n="n"/></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
    <e c="hic sunt dracones!"><p><l></l><r>segles<b/></r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l><b/>and<b/></l><r><b/>i<b/></r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l><b/>centuries</l><r></r></p><par n="B.C.-aC"/><p><l><s n="n"/></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
    <e c="hic sunt dracones!"><p><l></l><r>segles<b/></r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><i>-</i><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l><b/>centuries</l><r></r></p><par n="B.C.-aC"/><p><l><s n="n"/></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
